Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.039

Local government whistleblower proceedings—Costs.

Costs for the services of the office of administrative hearings for the initial twenty-four hours of services on a hearing under chapter 42.41 RCW shall be billed to the local government administrative hearings account. Costs for services beyond the initial twenty-four hours of services shall be allocated to the parties by the administrative law judge, the proportion to be borne by each party at the discretion of the administrative law judge. The charges for these costs shall be billed to the affected local government that shall recover payment from any other party specified by the administrative law judge.

[ 1992 c 44 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1992 c 44: See RCW 42.41.901.